Illinois, session 104th, SB2336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Design-Build Procurement Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 537/5)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2026)8    Sec. 5. Legislative policy. It is the intent of the 9General Assembly that the State construction agency be allowed 10to use the design-build delivery method for public projects if 11it is shown to be in the State's best interest for that 12particular project. It shall be the policy of the State 13construction agency in the procurement of design-build 14services to publicly announce all requirements for 15design-build services and to procure these services on the 16basis of demonstrated competence and qualifications and with 17due regard for the principles of competitive selection. 18    The State construction agency shall, prior to issuing 19requests for proposals, promulgate and publish procedures for 20the solicitation and award of contracts pursuant to this Act. 21    The State construction agency shall, for each public 22project or projects permitted under this Act, make a written 23determination, including a description as to the particular   SB2336- 2 -LRB104 10649 HLH 22260 b1advantages of the design-build procurement method, that it is 2in the best interests of this State to enter into a 3design-build contract for the project or projects. In making 4that determination, the following factors shall be considered: 5        (1) The probability that the design-build procurement 6    method will be in the best interests of the State by 7    providing a material savings of time or cost over the 8    design-bid-build or other delivery system. 9        (2) The type and size of the project and its 10    suitability to the design-build procurement method. 11        (3) The ability of the State construction agency to 12    define and provide comprehensive scope and performance 13    criteria for the project. 14    No State construction agency may use a design-build 15procurement method unless the agency determines in writing 16that the project will comply with the disadvantaged business 17and equal employment practices of the State as established in 18the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons 19with Disabilities Act and Section 2-105 of the Illinois Human 20Rights Act.21    The State construction agency shall within 15 days after 22the initial determination provide an advisory copy to the 23Procurement Policy Board and maintain the full record of 24determination for 5 years. 25    The provisions of this Section are inoperative for public 26institutions of higher education on and after January 1, 2026.   SB2336- 3 -LRB104 10649 HLH 22260 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1119, eff. 1-23-23.) 2    (30 ILCS 537/90 rep.)3    Section 10. The Design-Build Procurement Act is amended by 4repealing Section 90. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.